Wyoming, session 2025, HB0129.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 21-13-207 is amended to read:
21-13-207. Apportionment of funds by county
treasurer.
On the second Monday of each month, and on June 20 or the
last business day immediately preceding June 20 of each
year, the county treasurer shall apportion all monies in
the county treasury belonging to the county school fund,
including all interest earned thereon and including fines
and forfeitures, among the various school districts of the
county in the same percentages as provided by W.S.
21-13-201(b) and shall immediately pay the amount to each
school district.
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE
BILL NO. HB0129
ENROLLED ACT NO. 38, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 2. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
2